Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.901

Conversion of pending action to dissolution proceeding.

Any divorce action which was filed prior to July 15, 1973 and for which a final decree has not been entered on February 11, 1974, may, upon order of the superior court having jurisdiction over such proceeding for good cause shown, be converted to a dissolution proceeding and thereafter be continued under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 15 s 2.]